src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
! --------------------
!! The Lushootseed language adjectives compare.

LEXICON Comparisons
+A+Pos:0        Cases   ;
+A+Cmp:er       Cases   ;
+A+Sup:est      Cases   ;

LEXICON A_
: K ;

LEXICON DET_
: K ;

LEXICON DET-NEUTRAL-MSC_
K ;
LEXICON DET-NEUTRAL-FEM_
K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
