src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Lushootseed language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;
x̌ičəc:x̌ičəc A_ "red" ;
kay̓kay̓alus:kay̓kay̓alus A_ "sky blue" ;
č́uɫəyʔalus:č́uɫəyʔalus A_ "green" ;
x̌ibəč́:x̌ibəč́ A_ "black" ;
x̌ʷiqʷəq̓ʷ:x̌ʷiqʷəq̓ʷ A_ "white" ;
x̌ʷiqʷac:x̌ʷiqʷac A_ "yellow" ;
hikʷ:hikʷ A_ "big" ;
haʔɬ:haʔɬ A_ "good" ;
miʔman̓:miʔman̓ A_ "small" ;
q̓ič:q̓ič A_ "expensive" ;

təɬ+A:təɬ A_ "true|real" ;
wiʔx̌ʷ+v1+A:wiʔx̌ʷ A_ "lost" ;
wiʔx̌ʷ+v2+A:wix̌ʷ A_ "lost" ;
tə+Det:tə DET-NEUTRAL-MSC_ "the|a|neutral demonstrative" ;
tə+Det:tsə DET-NEUTRAL-FEM_ "the|a|neutral demonstrative" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
